Oklahoma, session 2026, SB73.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1104, as


last amended by Section 1, Chapter 442, O.S.L. 2024 (47 O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 1104), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1104. A. Unless otherwise provided by law, all fees,


taxes, and penalties collected or received pursuant to the Oklahoma


Vehicle License and Registration Act or Section 1-101 et seq. of


this title shall be apportioned and distributed monthly by the


Oklahoma Tax Commission in accordance with this section. Service


Oklahoma shall provide to the Oklahoma Tax Commission monthly


reports of motor vehicle collection information, including, but not


limited to, motor vehicle monthly apportionment information,

Req. No. 492 Page 1


refunds, canceled vouchers, waste tire collections, organ donor


program amounts, driver license records, prorate amounts, and sales


tax amounts. The reports shall be delivered electronically pursuant


to the current calendar year apportionment disbursement schedule


provided to Service Oklahoma by the Oklahoma Tax Commission on or


before December 1st annually.


One percent (1%) of fees collected shall be apportioned to the


Licensed Operator Performance Fund created in Section 3-106 of this


title, in accordance with the applicable metrics determined by


Service Oklahoma.


B. 1. The following percentages of the monies referred to in


subsection A of this section shall be apportioned to the various


school districts in accordance with paragraph 2 of this subsection:


a. from October 1, 2000, until June 30, 2001, thirty-five


and forty-six one-hundredths percent (35.46%),


b. for the year beginning July 1, 2001, and ending June


30, 2002, thirty-five and ninety-one one-hundredths


percent (35.91%),


c. for the year beginning July 1, 2002, through the year


ending on June 30, 2015, thirty-six and twenty one-


hundredths percent (36.20%),


d. for the year beginning July 1, 2015, through the year


ending on June 30, 2019, thirty-six and twenty one-


hundredths percent (36.20%), but in no event shall the

Req. No. 492 Page 2


amount apportioned in any fiscal year pursuant to this


subparagraph exceed the total amount apportioned for


the fiscal year ending on June 30, 2015. Any amounts


in excess of such limitation shall be placed to the


credit of the General Revenue Fund, and


e. for the year beginning July 1, 2019, and all


subsequent years, thirty-six and twenty one-hundredths


percent (36.20%), but in no event shall the amount


apportioned in any fiscal year pursuant to this


subparagraph exceed the total amount apportioned for


the fiscal year ending on June 30, 2015. Any amounts


in excess of such limitation shall be placed to the


credit of the Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver


Safety Fund created in Section 1521 of Title 69 of the


Oklahoma Statutes.


2. The monies apportioned pursuant to subparagraphs a through e


of paragraph 1 of this subsection shall be apportioned to the


various school districts so that each district shall receive an


amount based upon the proportion that each district’s average daily


attendance bears to the total average daily attendance of those


districts entitled to receive funds pursuant to this section as


certified by the State Department of Education.





Req. No. 492 Page 3


Each district’s allocation of funds shall be remitted to the


county treasurer of the county wherein the administrative


headquarters of the district are located.


No district shall be eligible for the funds herein provided


unless the district makes an ad valorem tax levy of fifteen (15)


mills and maintains nine (9) years of instruction and, pursuant to


the rules of the State Board of Education, is authorized to maintain


ten (10) years of instruction.


C. The following percentages of the monies referred to in


subsection A of this section shall be remitted to the State


Treasurer to be credited to the General Revenue Fund of the State


Treasury:


1. From October 1, 2000, until June 30, 2001, forty-five and


ninety-seven one-hundredths percent (45.97%);


2. For the year beginning July 1, 2001, and ending June 30,


2002, forty-five and twenty-nine one-hundredths percent (45.29%);


3. For the year beginning July 1, 2002, and for the subsequent


fiscal years ending June 30, 2007, forty-four and eighty-four one-


hundredths percent (44.84%);


4. For the year beginning July 1, 2007, and ending June 30,


2008, thirty-nine and eighty-four one-hundredths percent (39.84%);


5. For the year beginning July 1, 2008, and ending June 30,


2009, thirty-four and eighty-four one-hundredths percent (34.84%);



Req. No. 492 Page 4


6. For the period beginning July 1, 2009, and ending December


31, 2012, twenty-nine and eighty-four one-hundredths percent


(29.84%);


7. For the period beginning January 1, 2013, and ending June


30, 2013, twenty-nine and thirty-four one-hundredths percent


(29.34%);


8. For the year beginning July 1, 2013, and ending June 30,


2014, twenty-six and eighty-four one-hundredths percent (26.84%);


and


9. For the year beginning July 1, 2014, through the year ending


June 30, 2019, twenty-four and eighty-four one-hundredths percent


(24.84%).


D. The following percentages of the monies referred to in


subsection A of this section shall be remitted to the State


Treasurer to be credited to the State Transportation Fund:


1. From October 1, 2000, until June 30, 2001, thirty one-


hundredths percent (0.30%);


2. For the year beginning July 1, 2001, through the year ending


on June 30, 2015, thirty-one one-hundredths percent (0.31%);


3. For the year beginning July 1, 2015, through the year ending


on June 30, 2019, thirty-one one-hundredths percent (0.31%), but in


no event shall the amount apportioned in any fiscal year pursuant to


this paragraph exceed the total amount apportioned for the fiscal


year ending on June 30, 2015. Any amounts in excess of such

Req. No. 492 Page 5


limitation shall be placed to the credit of the General Revenue


Fund; and


4. For the year beginning July 1, 2019, and all subsequent


years, thirty-one one-hundredths percent (0.31%), but in no event


shall the amount apportioned in any fiscal year pursuant to this


paragraph exceed the total amount apportioned for the fiscal year


ending on June 30, 2015. Any amounts in excess of such limitation


shall be placed to the credit of the Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and


Driver Safety Fund created in Section 1521 of Title 69 of the


Oklahoma Statutes.


E. 1. The following percentages of the monies referred to in


subsection A of this section shall be apportioned to the various


counties as set forth in paragraph 2 of this subsection:


a. from October 1, 2000, until June 30, 2001, seven and


nine one-hundredths percent (7.09%),


b. for the year beginning July 1, 2001, and ending June


30, 2002, seven and eighteen one-hundredths percent


(7.18%),


c. for the year beginning July 1, 2002, through the year


ending on June 30, 2015, seven and twenty-four one-


hundredths percent (7.24%),


d. for the year beginning July 1, 2015, through the year


ending on June 30, 2019, seven and twenty-four one-


hundredths percent (7.24%), but in no event shall the

Req. No. 492 Page 6


amount apportioned in any fiscal year pursuant to this


subparagraph exceed the total amount apportioned for


the fiscal year ending on June 30, 2015. Any amounts


in excess of such limitation shall be placed to the


credit of the General Revenue Fund, and


e. for the year beginning July 1, 2019, and all


subsequent years, seven and twenty-four one-hundredths


percent (7.24%), but in no event shall the amount


apportioned in fiscal years 2019 through 2024 pursuant


to this subparagraph exceed the total amount


apportioned for the fiscal year ending on June 30,


2015, and in no event shall the amount apportioned in


fiscal year 2026 and subsequent fiscal years exceed


the amount apportioned for the fiscal year ending on


June 30, 2025. Any amounts in excess of such


limitation shall be placed to the credit of the


Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver Safety Fund


created in Section 1521 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma


Statutes.


2. The monies apportioned pursuant to subparagraphs a through e


of paragraph 1 of this subsection shall be apportioned as follows:


forty percent (40%) of such sum shall be distributed to the various


counties in that proportion which the county road mileage of each


county bears to the entire state road mileage as certified by the

Req. No. 492 Page 7


Transportation Commission and the remaining sixty percent (60%) of


such sum shall be distributed to the various counties on the basis


which the population and area of each county bears to the total


population and area of the state. The population shall be as shown


by the last Federal Decennial Census or the most recent annual


estimate provided by the United States Bureau of the Census. The


funds shall be used for the purpose of constructing and maintaining


county highways; provided, however, the county treasurer may deposit


so much of the funds in the sinking fund as may be necessary for the


retirement of interest and annual accrual of indebtedness created by


the issuance of county or township bonds for road purposes. Such


deposits to the sinking fund shall not exceed forty percent (40%) of


the funds allocated to a county pursuant to this paragraph.


F. 1. The following percentages of the monies referred to in


subsection A of this section shall be remitted to the county


treasurers of the respective counties and by them deposited in a


separate special revenue fund to be used by the county commissioners


in accordance with paragraph 2 of this subsection:


a. from October 1, 2000, until June 30, 2001, two and


fifty-three one-hundredths percent (2.53%),


b. for the year beginning July 1, 2001, and ending June


30, 2002, two and fifty-six one-hundredths percent


(2.56%),



Req. No. 492 Page 8


c. for the year beginning July 1, 2002, through the year


ending on June 30, 2015, two and fifty-nine one-


hundredths percent (2.59%),


d. for the year beginning July 1, 2015, through the year


ending on June 30, 2019, two and fifty-nine one-


hundredths percent (2.59%), but in no event shall the


amount apportioned in any fiscal year pursuant to this


subparagraph exceed the total amount apportioned for


the fiscal year ending on June 30, 2015. Any amounts


in excess of such limitation shall be placed to the


credit of the General Revenue Fund, and


e. for the year beginning July 1, 2019, and all


subsequent years, two and fifty-nine one-hundredths


percent (2.59%), but in no event shall the amount


apportioned in fiscal years 2019 through 2024 pursuant


to this subparagraph exceed the total amount


apportioned for the fiscal year ending on June 30,


2015, and in no event shall the amount apportioned in


fiscal year 2026 and subsequent fiscal years exceed


the amount apportioned for the fiscal year ending on


June 30, 2025. Any amounts in excess of such


limitation shall be placed to the credit of the


Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver Safety Fund



Req. No. 492 Page 9


created in Section 1521 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma


Statutes.


2. The monies apportioned pursuant to subparagraphs a through e


of paragraph 1 of this subsection shall be used for the primary


purpose of matching federal funds for the construction of federal


aid projects on county roads, or constructing and maintaining county


or township highways and permanent bridges of such counties. The


distribution of monies apportioned by this paragraph shall be made


upon the basis of the current formula based upon road mileage, area


and population as related to county road improvement and maintenance


costs. Provided, however, the Department of Transportation may


update the formula factors from time to time as necessary to account


for changing conditions.


G. 1. The following percentages of the monies referred to in


subsection A of this section shall be transmitted by the Oklahoma


Tax Commission to the various counties as set forth in paragraph 2


of this subsection:


a. from October 1, 2000, until June 30, 2001, three and


fifty-five one-hundredths percent (3.55%),


b. for the year beginning July 1, 2001, and ending June


30, 2002, three and fifty-nine one-hundredths percent


(3.59%),





Req. No. 492 Page 10


c. for the year beginning July 1, 2002, through the year


ending on June 30, 2015, three and sixty-two one-


hundredths percent (3.62%),


d. for the year beginning July 1, 2015, through the year


ending on June 30, 2019, three and sixty-two one-


hundredths percent (3.62%), but in no event shall the


amount apportioned in any fiscal year pursuant to this


subparagraph exceed the total amount apportioned for


the fiscal year ending on June 30, 2015. Any amounts


in excess of such limitation shall be placed to the


credit of the General Revenue Fund, and


e. for the year beginning July 1, 2019, and all


subsequent years, three and sixty-two one-hundredths


percent (3.62%), but in no event shall the amount


apportioned in fiscal years 2019 through 2024 pursuant


to this subparagraph exceed the total amount


apportioned for the fiscal year ending on June 30,


2015, and in no event shall the amount apportioned in


fiscal year 2026 and subsequent fiscal years exceed


the amount apportioned for the fiscal year ending on


June 30, 2025. Any amounts in excess of such


limitation shall be placed to the credit of the


Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver Safety Fund



Req. No. 492 Page 11


created in Section 1521 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma


Statutes.


2. The monies apportioned pursuant to subparagraphs a through e


of paragraph 1 of this subsection shall be transmitted to the


various counties on the basis of a formula to be developed by the


Department of Transportation. Such formula shall be similar to that


currently used for the distribution of County Bridge Program funds,


but also taking into consideration the effect of terrain and traffic


volume as related to county road improvement and maintenance costs.


Provided, however, the Department of Transportation may update the


formula factors from time to time as necessary to account for


changing conditions. The funds shall be transmitted to the various


county treasurers to be deposited in the county highway fund of


their respective counties.


H. 1. The following percentages of the monies referred to in


subsection A of this section shall be apportioned to the various


counties as set forth in paragraph 2 of this subsection:


a. from October 1, 2000, until June 30, 2001, eighty-one


one-hundredths percent (0.81%),


b. for the year beginning July 1, 2001, and ending June


30, 2002, eighty-two one-hundredths percent (0.82%),


c. for the year beginning July 1, 2002, through the year


ending on June 30, 2015, eighty-three one-hundredths


percent (0.83%),

Req. No. 492 Page 12


d. for the year beginning July 1, 2015, through the year


ending on June 30, 2019, eighty-three one-hundredths


percent (0.83%), but in no event shall the amount


apportioned in any fiscal year pursuant to this


subparagraph exceed the total amount apportioned for


the fiscal year ending on June 30, 2015. Any amounts


in excess of such limitation shall be placed to the


credit of the General Revenue Fund, and


e. for the year beginning July 1, 2019, and all


subsequent years, eighty-three one-hundredths percent


(0.83%), but in no event shall the amount apportioned


in any fiscal year pursuant to this subparagraph


exceed the total amount apportioned for the fiscal


year ending on June 30, 2015. Any amounts in excess


of such limitation shall be placed to the credit of


the Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver Safety Fund


created in Section 1521 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma


Statutes.


2. The monies apportioned pursuant to subparagraphs a through e


of paragraph 1 of this subsection shall be apportioned to the


various counties based upon the proportion that each county’s


population bears to the total state population.





Req. No. 492 Page 13


Each county’s allocation of funds shall be remitted to the


various county treasurers to be deposited in the general fund of the


county and used for the support of county government.


I. 1. The following percentages of the monies referred to in


subsection A of this section shall be apportioned to the various


cities and incorporated towns as set forth in paragraph 2 of this


subsection:


a. from October 1, 2000, until June 30, 2001, three and


four one-hundredths percent (3.04%),


b. for the year beginning July 1, 2001, and ending June


30, 2002, three and eight one-hundredths percent


(3.08%),


c. for the year beginning July 1, 2002, through the year


ending on June 30, 2015, three and ten one-hundredths


percent (3.10%),


d. for the year beginning July 1, 2015, through the year


ending on June 30, 2019, three and ten one-hundredths


percent (3.10%), but in no event shall the amount


apportioned in any fiscal year pursuant to this


subparagraph exceed the total amount apportioned for


the fiscal year ending on June 30, 2015. Any amounts


in excess of such limitation shall be placed to the


credit of the General Revenue Fund, and



Req. No. 492 Page 14


e. for the year beginning July 1, 2019, and all


subsequent years, three and ten one-hundredths percent


(3.10%), but in no event shall the amount apportioned


in any fiscal year pursuant to this subparagraph


exceed the total amount apportioned for the fiscal


year ending on June 30, 2015. Any amounts in excess


of such limitation shall be placed to the credit of


the Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver Safety Fund


created in Section 1521 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma


Statutes.


2. The monies apportioned pursuant to subparagraphs a through e


of paragraph 1 of this subsection shall be apportioned to the


various cities and incorporated towns based upon the proportion that


each city or incorporated town’s population bears to the total


population of all cities and incorporated towns in the state. Such


funds shall be remitted to the various county treasurers for


allocation to the various cities and incorporated towns. All such


funds shall be used for the construction, maintenance, repair,


improvement and lighting of streets and alleys. Provided, however,


the governing board of any city or town may, with the approval of


the county excise board, transfer any surplus funds to the general


revenue fund of such city or town whenever an emergency requires


such a transfer.



Req. No. 492 Page 15


J. The following percentages of the monies referred to in


subsection A of this section shall be remitted to the State


Treasurer to be credited to the Oklahoma Law Enforcement Retirement


Fund:


1. From October 1, 2000, until June 30, 2001, one and twenty-


two one-hundredths percent (1.22%);


2. For the year beginning July 1, 2001, and ending June 30,


2002, one and twenty-three one-hundredths percent (1.23%); and


3. For the year beginning July 1, 2002, and all subsequent


years, one and twenty-four one-hundredths percent (1.24%).


K. Three one-hundredths of one percent (3/100 of 1%) of the


monies referred to in subsection A of this section shall be remitted


to the State Treasurer to be credited to the Wildlife Conservation


Fund. Seventy-five percent (75%) of the funds shall be used for


fish habitat restoration and twenty-five percent (25%) of the funds


shall be used in the fish hatchery system for fish production.


L. 1. For the year beginning July 1, 2007, and ending June 30,


2008, five percent (5%) of monies referred to in subsection A of


this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer to be credited


to the County Improvements for Roads and Bridges Fund as created in


Section 507 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


2. For the year beginning July 1, 2008, and ending June 30,


2009, ten percent (10%) of monies referred to in subsection A of


this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer to be credited

Req. No. 492 Page 16


to the County Improvements for Roads and Bridges Fund as created in


Section 507 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


3. For the period beginning July 1, 2009, and ending December


31, 2012, fifteen percent (15%) of monies referred to in subsection


A of this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer to be


credited to the County Improvements for Roads and Bridges Fund as


created in Section 507 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


4. For the period beginning January 1, 2013, and ending June


30, 2013, fifteen and fifty one-hundredths percent (15.50%) of


monies referred to in subsection A of this section shall be remitted


to the State Treasurer to be credited to the County Improvements for


Roads and Bridges Fund as created in Section 507 of Title 69 of the


Oklahoma Statutes.


5. For the year beginning July 1, 2013, and ending June 30,


2014, eighteen percent (18%) of monies referred to in subsection A


of this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer to be


credited to the County Improvements for Roads and Bridges Fund as


created in Section 507 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


6. For the year beginning July 1, 2014, twenty percent (20%) of


monies referred to in subsection A of this section shall be remitted


to the State Treasurer to be credited to the County Improvements for


Roads and Bridges Fund as created in Section 507 of Title 69 of the


Oklahoma Statutes.



Req. No. 492 Page 17


7. For the year beginning July 1, 2015, through the year ending


on June 30, 2019, twenty percent (20%) of monies referred to in


subsection A of this section shall be remitted to the State


Treasurer to be credited to the County Improvements for Roads and


Bridges Fund as created in Section 507 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, but in no event shall the total amount apportioned in any


fiscal year pursuant to this paragraph exceed One Hundred Twenty


Million Dollars ($120,000,000.00). Any amounts in excess of One


Hundred Twenty Million Dollars ($120,000,000.00) shall be placed to


the credit of the General Revenue Fund.


8. a. Except as provided in subparagraph b of this


paragraph, for the year beginning July 1, 2019, and


all subsequent years, twenty percent (20%) of monies


referred to in subsection A of this section shall be


remitted to the State Treasurer to be credited to the


County Improvements for Roads and Bridges Fund as


created in Section 507 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, but in no event shall the total amount


apportioned in any fiscal year pursuant to this


paragraph exceed the fiscal year limitations provided


in subparagraph c of this paragraph Two Hundred


Million Dollars ($200,000,000.00). Any amounts in


excess of the fiscal year limitations provided in


subparagraph c of this paragraph Two Hundred Million

Req. No. 492 Page 18


Dollars ($200,000,000.00) shall be placed to the


credit of the Rebuilding Oklahoma Access and Driver


Safety Fund created in Section 1521 of Title 69 of the


Oklahoma Statutes,


b. (1) for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2021,


through the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the


Oklahoma Tax Commission shall remit twenty-five


percent (25%) of the monthly allocation,


otherwise scheduled to be credited to the County


Improvements for Roads and Bridges Fund, to the


various counties of the state. The Commission


shall distribute such funds monthly to each


county treasurer as follows:


(a) one-third (1/3) of such funds shall be


distributed to the various counties in the


proportion which the area of each county


bears to the total area of the state,


(b) one-third (1/3) of such funds shall be


distributed to the various counties in the


proportion which the certified county road


miles of each county bear to the total sum


of county road miles in the state, and


(c) one-third (1/3) of such funds shall be


distributed to the various counties in the

Req. No. 492 Page 19


proportion which the total replacement cost


for obsolete or deficient bridges according


to the most recent Department of


Transportation yearly Bridge Summary Report


for County Bridges for each county bears to


the total amount of such cost for all such


county bridges in the state, and


(2) for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and


all subsequent fiscal years thereafter, the


Oklahoma Tax Commission shall remit twenty-five


percent (25%) of the monthly allocation,


otherwise scheduled to be credited to the County


Improvements for Roads and Bridges Fund, to the


various counties of the state. The Commission


shall distribute such funds monthly to each


county treasurer as follows:


(a) one-third (1/3) of such funds shall be


distributed to the various counties in the


proportion which the area of each county


bears to the total area of the state,


(b) one-third (1/3) of such funds shall be


distributed to the various counties in the


proportion which the certified county road



Req. No. 492 Page 20


miles of each county bear to the total sum


of county road miles in the state, and


(c) one-third (1/3) of such funds shall be


distributed to the various counties in the


proportion which the number of county


bridges in each county according to the


Department of Transportation 2020 Bridge


Summary Report for County Bridges bears to


the total sum of county bridges in the state


according to such report.


Each county treasurer shall deposit such funds to the


county’s county highway fund and such funds shall be used


for maintenance and operations. In no event shall the


total amount apportioned in any fiscal year pursuant to the


provisions of subparagraphs a and b of this paragraph


exceed the fiscal year limitations provided in subparagraph


c of this paragraph, and


c. the total amount apportioned each fiscal year pursuant


to this paragraph shall be limited as follows:


(1) for fiscal years 2020


through 2022 $120,000,000.00,


(2) for fiscal year 2023 $125,000,000.00,


(3) for fiscal year 2024 $130,000,000.00,


(4) for fiscal year 2025 $135,000,000.00,

Req. No. 492 Page 21


(5) for fiscal year 2026 $140,000,000.00,


(6) for fiscal year 2027 $145,000,000.00,


(7) for fiscal year 2028 and all


subsequent fiscal years


thereafter $150,000,000.00.


M. Twenty-four and eighty-four one-hundredths percent (24.84%)


of the monies referred to in subsection A of this section shall be


remitted to the State Treasurer to be credited to the Rebuilding


Oklahoma Access and Driver Safety Fund created in Section 1521 of


Title 69 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


N. Monies allocated to counties by this section may be


estimated by the county excise board in the budget for the county as


anticipated revenue to the extent of ninety percent (90%) of the


previous year’s income from such source; provided, not more than


fifteen percent (15%) can be encumbered during any month.


O. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, for


the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2003, the first One Hundred


Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) of the monies collected or received


by the Oklahoma Tax Commission pursuant to the registration of


motorcycles and mopeds in this state shall be placed to the credit


of the Oklahoma Tax Commission Revolving Fund.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby

Req. No. 492 Page 22


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-492 CJD 1/19/2025 5:42:09 AM









































Req. No. 492 Page 23